Georgia, session 2025_26, HB485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
- 1 -

25 LC 39 4767S
15 PART I
16 Contingency provisions
17 SECTION 1-1.
18 The Official Code of Georgia Annotated is amended by repealing and reserving the
19 following:
20 (1) Article 12 of Chapter 4 of Title 26, relating to prescription medication integrity.
21 (2) Chapter 30 of Title 31, relating to reports on veterans exposed to Agent Orange.
22 (3) Subsections (d) and (f) of Code Section 35-8-26, relating to TASER and electronic
23 control weapons, requirements for use, establishment of policies, and training.
24 (4) Subsection (k) of Code Section 43-34-8, relating to authority of Georgia Composite
25 Medical Board to refuse license, certificate, or permit or issue discipline, suspension,
26 restoration, investigations, hearings on fitness, immunity, and publication of final
27 disciplinary actions.
28 SECTION 1-2.
29 Said Code is further amended in Code Section 31-8-302, relating to procedures for donation
30 and dispensing of unused over-the-counter and prescription drugs, by revising subsection (i)
31 as follows:
32 "(i) The donation, brokering, or other facilitation of a donation of a drug pursuant to this
33 program shall not be considered wholesale distribution as defined in Code Section
34 26-4-201 and shall not be subject to or require licensure as a wholesale distributor pursuant
35 to Chapter 4 of Title 26."
36 SECTION 1-3.
37 An Act revising the "Georgia Veterinary Practice Act," approved June 3, 2003
38 (Ga. L. 2003, p. 615/HB 347), is amended by repealing Part II.
- 2 -

25 LC 39 4767S
39 PART II
40 Terminology modernizations and various clean up
41 SECTION 2-1.
42 The Official Code of Georgia Annotated is amended by revising Code Section 7-4-8, relating
43 to commission to third person does not make lawful interest usurious, as follows:
44 "7-4-8.
45 Except as the application of this Code section is modified by Code Section 7-3-5, where
46 Where the lender neither takes nor contracts to take more than lawful interest, the loan is
47 not rendered usurious by money paid or agreed to be paid others by the borrower in order
48 to obtain the loan."
49 SECTION 2-2.
50 Said Code is further amended in Code Section 12-7-6, relating to best management practices,
51 compliance with federal law, and minimum requirements for rules, regulations, ordinances,
52 or resolutions, by revising paragraph (16) of subsection (b) and subsection (c) as follows:
53 "(16) There is established a 50 foot buffer, as measured horizontally from the point
54 where vegetation has been wrested by normal stream flow or wave action, along the
55 banks of any state waters classified as 'trout streams' pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 5
56 of this title trout waters pursuant to Code Section 27-4-51 except where a roadway
57 drainage structure must be constructed; provided, however, that small springs and streams
58 classified as trout streams waters which discharge an average annual flow of 25 gallons
59 per minute or less shall have a 25 foot buffer or they may be piped, at the discretion of
60 the landowner, pursuant to the terms of a rule providing for a general variance
61 promulgated by the board providing for notice to the division or local issuing authority
62 of the location and extent of the piping and prescribed methodology for minimizing the
63 impact of such piping and for measuring the volume of water discharged by the stream.
- 3 -

25 LC 39 4767S
64 Any such pipe must shall stop short of the downstream landowner's property, and the
65 landowner must shall comply with the buffer requirement for any adjacent trout streams
66 waters. The director may grant a variance from such buffer to allow land-disturbing
67 activity, provided that adequate erosion control measures are incorporated in the project
68 plans and specifications and are implemented. The following requirements shall apply
69 to any such buffer:
70 (A) No land-disturbing activities shall be conducted within a buffer and a buffer shall
71 remain in its natural, undisturbed state of vegetation until all land-disturbing activities
72 on the construction site are completed. Once the final stabilization of the site is
73 achieved, a buffer may be thinned or trimmed of vegetation as long as a protective
74 vegetative cover remains to protect water quality and aquatic habitat and a natural
75 canopy is left in sufficient quantity to keep shade on the stream bed; provided, however,
76 that any person constructing a single-family residence, when such residence is
77 constructed by or under contract with the owner for his or her own occupancy, may thin
78 or trim vegetation in a buffer at any time as long as protective vegetative cover remains
79 to protect water quality and aquatic habitat and a natural canopy is left in sufficient
80 quantity to keep shade on the stream bed;
81 (B) On or before December 31, 2000, the board shall adopt rules which contain
82 specific criteria for the grant or denial by the director of requests for variances. After
83 such date, no variance shall be granted by the director which is not consistent with the
84 criteria contained in such rules; provided, however, that, should the board fail to adopt
85 rules which contain specific criteria for the grant or denial of requests for variances by
86 the director on or before December 31, 2000, the authority of the director to issue such
87 variances shall be suspended until the board adopts such rules; and
88 (C) The buffer shall not apply to the following land-disturbing activities, provided that
89 they occur at an angle, as measured from the point of crossing, within 25 degrees of
90 perpendicular to the stream; they cause a width of disturbance of not more than 50 feet
- 4 -

25 LC 39 4767S
91 within the buffer; and adequate erosion control measures are incorporated into the
92 project plans and specifications and are implemented:
93 (i) Stream crossings for water lines; or
94 (ii) Stream crossings for sewer lines; and"
95 "(c) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prevent any local issuing authority from
96 adopting rules and regulations, ordinances, or resolutions which contain stream buffer
97 requirements that exceed the minimum requirements in subsection (b) of this Code
98 section."
99 SECTION 2-3.
100 Said Code is further amended in Code Section 12-7-12, relating to orders directed to
101 violators and stop work order procedures, by revising subsection (d) as follows:
102 "(d) When a violation of this chapter in the form of taking action without a permit, failure
103 to maintain a stream the required buffer, or significant amounts of sediment, as determined
104 by the local issuing authority or by the director or his or her designee, have been or are
105 being discharged into state waters and where best management practices have not been
106 properly designed, installed, and maintained, a stop work order shall be issued by the local
107 issuing authority or by the director or his or her designee. All such stop work orders shall
108 be effective immediately upon issuance and shall be in effect until the necessary corrective
109 action or mitigation has occurred. Such stop work orders shall apply to all land-disturbing
110 activity on the site with the exception of the installation and maintenance of temporary or
111 permanent erosion and sediment controls."
112 SECTION 2-4.
113 Said Code is further amended in Code Section 12-7-17, relating to exemptions relative to
114 control of soil erosion and sedimentation, by revising paragraph (4) as follows:
- 5 -

25 LC 39 4767S
115 "(4) The construction of single-family residences, when such construction disturbs less
116 than one acre and is not a part of a larger common plan of development or sale with a
117 planned disturbance of equal to or greater than one acre and not otherwise exempted
118 under this paragraph; provided, however, that construction of any such residence shall
119 conform to the minimum requirements as set forth in subsection (b) of Code Section
120 12-7-6 and this paragraph. For single-family residence construction covered by the
121 provisions of this paragraph, there shall be a buffer zone between the residence and any
122 state waters classified as trout streams pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title
123 waters pursuant to Code Section 27-4-51. In any such buffer zone, no land-disturbing
124 activity shall be constructed between the residence and the point where vegetation has
125 been wrested by normal stream flow or wave action from the banks of the trout waters.
126 For primary trout waters, the buffer zone shall be at least 50 horizontal feet, and no
127 variance to a smaller buffer shall be granted. For secondary trout waters, the buffer zone
128 shall be at least 50 horizontal feet, but the director may grant variances to no less than 25
129 feet. Regardless of whether a trout stream is trout waters are primary or secondary, for
130 first order trout waters, which are streams into which no other streams flow except for
131 springs, the buffer shall be at least 25 horizontal feet, and no variance to a smaller buffer
132 shall be granted. The minimum requirements of subsection (b) of Code Section 12-7-6
133 and the buffer zones provided by this paragraph shall be enforced by the issuing
134 authority;"
135 SECTION 2-5.
136 Said Code is further amended in Code Section 20-2-206, relating to alternative teacher
137 certification program and creditable service, by revising subsection (b) as follows:
138 "(b)(1) Each local school system may provide an alternative teacher certification program
139 upon approval by the Professional Standards Commission for a secondary school teacher
140 candidate to teach a course or courses in a core academic subject who:
- 6 -

25 LC 39 4767S
141 (A) Possesses a master's degree, doctoral degree, or Juris Doctor in each academic
142 subject in which the candidate will teach;
143 (B) Receives high-quality professional development that is sustained, intensive, and
144 classroom focused in order to have a positive and lasting impact on classroom
145 instruction, before and while teaching;
146 (C) Participates in a program of intensive supervision that consists of structured
147 guidance and regular ongoing support for teachers or a teacher mentoring program;
148 (D) Assumes functions as a teacher only for a specified period of time not to exceed
149 three years; and
150 (E) Demonstrates satisfactory progress toward full certification as prescribed by the
151 Professional Standards Commission.
152 (2) The Professional Standards Commission shall apply the least restrictive standards
153 when approving a school system developed program under this subsection.
154 (3) Any teacher certified pursuant to this subsection shall be considered a highly
155 qualified teacher for purposes of the federal No Child Left Behind Act (P.L. 107-110)."
156 SECTION 2-6.
157 Said Code is further amended in Code Section 20-2-1160, relating to local boards to be
158 tribunals to determine school law controversies, appeals, and special provisions for disabled
159 children, by revising subsection (f) as follows:
160 "(f) The procedures provided in subsections (a) through (e) of this Code section shall not
161 be applicable to disabled children when a hearing is necessary to decide a complaint made
162 under the federal Education for All Handicapped Children Act of 1975 Individuals with
163 Disabilities Education Act. The state board shall promulgate by rules and regulations an
164 impartial due process procedure for hearing and determining any matter of local
165 controversy in reference to the construction or administration of the school law with respect
166 to disabled children as such term is defined by the state board. Any tribunal which the state
- 7 -

25 LC 39 4767S
167 board shall empower to hear such cases shall have the power to summon witnesses and take
168 testimony as such tribunal deems it necessary. In promulgating such rules and regulations,
169 the state board shall consult with local boards of education and other local school officials
170 in order to establish procedures required by this subsection which will coordinate, to the
171 extent practicable, with the administrative practices of such local boards."
172 SECTION 2-7.
173 Said Code is further amended in Code Section 20-2-2116, relating to amount of scholarship
174 for special needs students and method of payments, by revising subsection (c) as follows:
175 "(c) Scholarship students shall be counted in the enrollment of their resident school system;
176 provided, however, that this count shall only be for purposes of determining the amount of
177 the scholarship and the scholarship students shall not be included as enrolled for purposes
178 of state or federal accountability requirements, including, but not limited to, the federal
179 Elementary and Secondary Education Act, as amended by the No Child Left Behind Act
180 of 2001 (P.L. 107-110) federal Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, 20 U.S.C. Section
181 6301. The funds needed to provide a scholarship shall be subtracted from the allotment
182 payable to the resident school system."
183 SECTION 2-8.
184 Said Code is further amended in Code Section 20-2-2131, relating to enrollment of students
185 in school to which not originally assigned, procedure, annual notification, and exception, by
186 revising paragraph (4) of subsection (a) as follows:
187 "(4) This subsection shall not be construed to affect any student currently attending a
188 school other than the school to which the student has been assigned by the local board of
189 education pursuant to a transfer authorized under the federal No Child Left Behind Act
190 (P.L. 107-110) Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, 20 U.S.C. Section 6301."
- 8 -

25 LC 39 4767S
191 SECTION 2-9.
192 Said Code is further amended by repealing Code Section 40-5-4.1, relating to authorized
193 delay in compliance with federal Real ID Act.
194 SECTION 2-10.
195 Said Code is further amended by revising Code Section 40-6-56, relating to procedure for
196 passing a bicyclist, as follows:
197 "40-6-56.
198 (a) The operator of a motor vehicle approaching a bicycle shall approach the bicycle with
199 due caution and, when traveling in the same direction, shall proceed as follows:
200 (1) Make a lane change into a lane not adjacent to the bicycle if possible in the existing
201 road and traffic conditions; or
202 (2) If a lane change under paragraph (1) of this subsection would be impossible,
203 prohibited by law, or unsafe, reduce the speed of the motor vehicle to a reasonable and
204 proper speed for the existing road and traffic conditions, which speed shall be at least ten
205 miles per hour less than the posted speed limit or 25 miles per hour, whichever is more,
206 and proceed around the bicycle with at least three feet between such vehicle and the
207 bicycle at all times.
208 (b) Any violation of this Code section shall be a misdemeanor punished by a fine of not
209 more than $250.00."
210 SECTION 2-11.
211 Said Code is further amended in Code Section 43-15-13.1, relating to requirements for
212 professional land surveyors engaged in design of storm-water management plans, facilities,
213 water distribution lines, and sanitary sewer collection systems, by revising paragraph (2) as
214 follows:
- 9 -

25 LC 39 4767S
215 "(2) Complete an additional three semester hours of coursework in hydrology, possess
216 the requisite experience required by the board, and pass the hydrology exam. The
217 licensing record for such individual as available to the public shall be marked as
218 'hydrology and design authorized.'"
219 SECTION 2-12.
220 Said Code is further amended by revising Code Section 43-20-11, relating to apprentice
221 dispenser's permit and training permits, as follows:
222 "43-20-11.
223 (a) An apprentice dispenser's permit shall be issued by the division director on behalf of
224 the board only when:
225 (1) Application has been made;
226 (2) A statement of supervision has been provided by a licensed dispenser;
227 (3) A statement has been made by the supervising dealer that the applicant is capable of
228 making the tests and applying the techniques required to dispense hearing aids in
229 accordance with this chapter;
230 (4) Proof of age has been made. Apprentice dispensers' permits are limited to one year
231 in duration and shall not be renewed; and
232 (5) The applicant has passed the practical portion of the examination.
233 (b) Apprentice dispensers' permits are limited to one year in duration and shall not be
234 renewed.
235 (c) Training permits shall be issued by the division director on behalf of the board only
236 when application has been made and a statement of supervision has been provided by a
237 licensed dispenser. The permit should authorize the person to dispense hearing aids only
238 under direct supervision and immediate observation of the licensed dispenser who shall be
239 responsible for the trainees' compliance with this chapter. Proof of age shall also be made.
240 Training permits should be for a duration of six months and may be renewed as often as
- 10 -

25 LC 39 4767S
241 necessary for additional six-month time periods so long as the requirements of this Code
242 section for issuance of permits are met for each renewal."
243 SECTION 2-13.
244 Said Code is further amended by revising Code Section 44-3-234, relating to application of
245 article relative to property owners' associations, as follows:
246 "44-3-234.
247 The limitations provided in subsection (b) and paragraphs (1), (2), and (4) of subsection (d)
248 of Code Section 44-5-60 shall not apply to any covenants contained in any instrument
249 created pursuant to or submitted pursuant to this article."
250 SECTION 2-14.
251 Said Code is further amended in Code Section 50-8-60, relating to definitions relative to
252 conflicts of interest in contract administration by the Department of Community Affairs, by
253 revising paragraph (4) as follows:
254 "(4) Reserved. 'Council member' means any member of the council of a regional
255 commission established under Article 2 of this chapter."
256 PART III
257 Unconstitutional provisions
258 SECTION 3-1.
259 Said Code is further amended by repealing Code Section 3-7-43, relating to issuance of
260 alcoholic beverage licenses to private clubs by governing authorities of certain counties and
261 municipalities, privileges conferred by licenses, rules and regulations, and sale by
262 wholesalers to licensees.
- 11 -

25 LC 39 4767S
263 SECTION 3-2.
264 Said Code is further amended by repealing and reserving the following:
265 (1) Paragraph (6) of Code Section 10-1-233, relating to acts of gasoline distributor violating
266 article relative to gasoline marketing practices.
267 (2) Code Section 16-11-34, relating to preventing or disrupting lawful meetings, gatherings,
268 or processions.
269 (3) Code Section 16-15-9, relating to commission of offense admissible as evidence of
270 existence of criminal street gang.
271 (4) Code Section 20-2-1182, relating to persons other than students who insult or abuse
272 school teachers in presence of pupils may be ordered to leave school premises.
273 (5) Code Section 36-1-16, relating to garbage, trash, waste, or refuse not to be transported
274 across state or county boundaries for dumping without permission and exemption.
275 (6) Code Section 36-6-27, relating to execution against county treasurer for failure to pay
276 over money.
277 (7) Code Section 40-1-4, relating to stickers, decals, or emblems upon motor vehicles
278 containing profane or lewd words describing sexual acts, excretory functions, or parts of the
279 human body.
280 (8) Code Section 40-2-111, relating to highway use permit required for certain unregistered
281 motor trucks, application, fee, and identification tag to be displayed and permit to be carried
282 in truck.
283 (9) Code Section 40-2-112, relating to additional fee for each round trip by an unregistered
284 motor truck into state.
285 (10) Paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 40-2-114, relating to unlawful acts and
286 penalties.
287 (11) Subparagraph (B.1) of paragraph (3) of Code Section 48-5-2, relating to definitions
288 relative to ad valorem taxation of property.
- 12 -

25 LC 39 4767S
289 SECTION 3-3.
290 Said Code is further amended by revising Code Section 15-11-703, relating to use of
291 disposition and evidence in juvenile courts, as follows:
292 "15-11-703.
293 Except as provided in subsection (d) of Code Section 24-6-609, the disposition of a child
294 and evidence adduced in a hearing in the juvenile court shall not be used against such child
295 in any proceeding in any court other than as provided in Code Section 16-15-9 or 24-4-418
296 or for a proceeding for delinquency or a child in need of services, whether before or after
297 reaching 18 years of age, except in the establishment of conditions of bail, plea
298 negotiations, and sentencing in criminal offenses; and, in such excepted cases, such records
299 of dispositions and evidence shall be available to prosecuting attorneys, superior or state
300 court judges, and the accused and may be used in the same manner as adult records.
301 Whenever such record of disposition is filed in a superior or state court or admitted into
302 evidence in a superior or state court proceeding, it shall be filed under seal."
303 SECTION 3-4.
304 Said Code is further amended by repealing Code Section 40-13-60, relating to disposition of
305 traffic violations and jurisdiction of bureau, and enacting a new Code Section 40-13-60 to
306 read as follows:
307 "40-13-60.
308 Any traffic violation under the jurisdiction of the traffic violations bureau shall be
309 characterized and classified as a traffic violation and shall not be considered as a
310 misdemeanor. Whenever any traffic violation is transferred from another court to a court
311 which has a traffic violations bureau, if such offense is classified as a traffic violation on
312 the traffic violations bureau schedule of the receiving court, such violation shall be handled
313 and disposed of by such traffic violations bureau. Where a defendant demands a trial on
314 a traffic violation, it shall be transferred to a court in the jurisdiction which established the
- 13 -

25 LC 39 4767S
315 traffic violations bureau; provided, however, that such request for a trial shall not result in
316 a loss of jurisdiction by the traffic violations bureau."
317 SECTION 3-5.
318 Said Code is further amended by repealing Code Section 48-7-2, relating to unlawful failure
319 to pay income tax, file return, keep records, supply information, or exhibit books and penalty,
320 and enacting a new Code Section 48-7-2 to read as follows:
321 "48-7-2.
322 (a) It shall be unlawful for any person who is required under this chapter to pay any tax,
323 make any return, keep any records, supply any information, or exhibit any books or records
324 for the purpose of computation, assessment, or collection of any tax imposed by this
325 chapter to fail to:
326 (1) Pay the tax;
327 (2) Make the return;
328 (3) Keep the records; or
329 (4) When requested to do so by the commissioner:
330 (A) Supply the information; or
331 (B) Exhibit the books or records.
332 (b) In addition to other penalties provided by law, any person who violates subsection (a)
333 of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, however, that punishment
334 for failure to pay tax owed shall be limited to a fine of not more than $1,000.00."
335 SECTION 3-6.
336 Said Code is further amended by repealing Code Section 48-13-6, relating to levy of
337 occupation tax by counties and municipalities on businesses and practitioners of professions
338 and occupations and hearing on tax increase, and enacting a new Code Section 48-13-6 to
339 read as follows:
- 14 -

25 LC 39 4767S
340 "48-13-6.
341 (a) Except as to those businesses and practitioners of professions and occupations excluded
342 by subsection (a) of Code Section 48-13-16, those persons excluded by Code
343 Section 43-12-1, and those persons engaged in the authorized practice of law, the
344 governing authority of each county shall be authorized but not required to:
345 (1) Provide by local ordinance or resolution for the levy, assessment, and collection of
346 occupation tax on those businesses and practitioners of professions and occupations with
347 one or more locations or offices in the unincorporated part of the county and to provide
348 for the punishment of violation of such a local ordinance or resolution;
349 (2) Classify businesses and practitioners of professions and occupations and to assess
350 different taxes on different classes of businesses and practitioners; and
351 (3) Provide by local ordinance or resolution for requiring information from businesses
352 and practitioners of professions and occupations doing business in the unincorporated
353 part of the county regarding the site of any location or office and payment of occupation
354 taxes or regulatory fees to other local governments and to provide for the punishment for
355 violation of such a local ordinance or resolution.
356 (b) Except as to those businesses and practitioners of professions and occupations
357 excluded by subsection (a) of Code Section 48-13-16, those persons excluded by Code
358 Section 43-12-1, and those persons engaged in the authorized practice of law, the
359 governing authority of each municipal corporation shall be authorized but not required to:
360 (1) Provide by local ordinance or resolution for the levy, assessment, and collection of
361 occupation tax on those businesses and practitioners of professions and occupations with
362 one or more locations or offices within the corporate limits of the municipality and to
363 provide for the punishment of violation of such a local ordinance or resolution;
364 (2) Classify businesses and practitioners of professions and occupations and to assess
365 different taxes on different classes of businesses and practitioners; and
- 15 -

25 LC 39 4767S
366 (3) Provide by local ordinance or resolution for requiring information from businesses
367 and practitioners of professions and occupations doing business within the corporate
368 limits of the municipality regarding the site of any location or office and payment of
369 occupation taxes or regulatory fees to other local governments and to provide for the
370 punishment for violation of such a local ordinance or resolution.
371 (c) After April 11, 1995, any local government shall conduct at least one public hearing
372 prior to the adoption of any ordinance or resolution regarding an occupation tax authorized
373 by this Code section.
374 (d) This Code section shall supercede any provision of local law or city charter that
375 authorizes taxes upon professions set forth in this Code section."
376 PART IV
377 Repealer
378 SECTION 4-1.
379 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 16 -